src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! ====================================== !
!! # Verbal morphology               
! ====================================== !

LEXICON Verbs
verb    V_   ;
!verbs ; 
  V_koi2x ;

!LEXICON V_NO-FST
!+V: K ;

LEXICON V_
+WORK: # ;


!! ## Closed class verbs
! ------------------
LEXICON AUXILIARIES
бы+Pcle+Aux+Cond:бы WordEnd ;
вай+Pcle+Aux+Imprt:вай WordEnd ;
вайко+Pcle+Aux+Imprt:вайко WordEnd ;

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
!Present Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ог MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:он MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:оз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ог MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:од MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:одӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:оз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:озӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;


!Past Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg2:эн MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Sg3:эз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:эд MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:эгӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:эдӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:эз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:эзӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

!Imperative
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энӧ K ;
!A tag is needed to indicate this clitic-like лы segment
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:энлы K ;

! Negative copula supletive present forms
абу+V+Neg+Cop+Ind+Sg:абу K ; ! Aux these are supletive. Past is эз вӧв
абу+V+Neg+Cop+Ind+Pl:абуӧсь K ; ! Aux these are supletive. Past is эз вӧвны


!! ## Open class verbs
! ----------------

!! Some Flag diacritic lines are with regexes, other with aligned zeros. We want to migrate to
!! regexes < … > , for readability reasons (sic!)

LEXICON V_LOKNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** One verb only, локны:лок U9 — глагол локны
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@+Inf+Px1:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@%>ным VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@+Inf+Px2:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@%>ныт VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@+Inf+Px3:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@%>ныс VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Sg2:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>т VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>т VerbDer-V ; !
:т  VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а

!! Begin work with TV and IV
LEXICON BV_SHUNY
TV_SHUNY ;
IV_SHUNY ;
LEXICON BV_JUAYSHNY
TV_JUAYSHNY ;
IV_JUAYSHNY ;
LEXICON BV_AMNY
TV_AMNY ;
IV_AMNY ;
LEXICON BV_KYJNY !U6 — глагол йны
TV_KYJNY ;
IV_KYJNY ;
LEXICON BV_CHILOESNY
TV_CHILOESNY ;
IV_CHILOESNY ;
LEXICON BV_KUTNY
TV_KUTNY ;
IV_KUTNY ;
LEXICON BV_NUAVNY !U7 — глагол вны
TV_NUAVNY ;
IV_NUAVNY ;
LEXICON BV_ARTASJNY
TV_ARTASJNY ;
IV_ARTASJNY ;
LEXICON BV_LYDDJYNY
TV_LYDDJYNY ;
IV_LYDDJYNY ;
LEXICON BV_VOLYNY
TV_VOLYNY ;
IV_VOLYNY ;

LEXICON TV_SHUNY
+TV: V_SHUNY ;
LEXICON TV_JUAYSHNY
+TV: V_JUAYSHNY;
LEXICON TV_AMNY
+TV: V_AMNY ;
LEXICON TV_KYJNY
+TV: V_KYJNY;
LEXICON TV_CHILOESNY
+TV: V_CHILOESNY ;
LEXICON TV_KUTNY
+TV: V_KUTNY ;
LEXICON TV_NUAVNY
+TV: V_NUAVNY ;
LEXICON TV_ARTASJNY
+TV: V_ARTASJNY ;
LEXICON TV_LYDDJYNY
+TV: V_LYDDJYNY ;
LEXICON TV_VOLYNY
+TV: V_VOLYNY ;

LEXICON IV_SHUNY
+IV: V_SHUNY ;
LEXICON IV_JUAYSHNY
+IV: V_JUAYSHNY;
LEXICON IV_AMNY
+IV: V_AMNY ;
LEXICON IV_KYJNY
+IV: V_KYJNY;
LEXICON IV_CHILOESNY
+IV: V_CHILOESNY ;
LEXICON IV_KUTNY
+IV: V_KUTNY ;
LEXICON IV_NUAVNY
+IV: V_NUAVNY ;
LEXICON IV_ARTASJNY
+IV: V_ARTASJNY ;
LEXICON IV_LYDDJYNY
+IV: V_LYDDJYNY ;
LEXICON IV_VOLYNY
+IV: V_VOLYNY ;

LEXICON VR_SHUNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_SHUNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_JUAYSHNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** is there ш : шт gradation
 V_AMNY ; 
!LEXICON VR_AMNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj_AMNY ; !а
!+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_AMNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** амны:ам Ending in -мны, -жны, -дзны,
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj_AMNY ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

!LEXICON VR_KYJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj_KYJNY ; !а
!+Refl:й VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_KYJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** кыйны:кый Ending in -йны, 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj_KYJNY ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_CHILOESNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** is there s : st alternation 2018-09-01
 V_KUTNY ;

!LEXICON VR_KUTNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
!+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_KUTNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** шуны:шу янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

!LEXICON VR_NUAVNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ нуавны:нуа
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@в Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@л Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@л VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@в VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl:л VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
!+Refl:в VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_NUAVNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** нуавны:нуа
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^LVBound Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^LVBound VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj_KUTNY ; !а
:%^LVBound VerbConj-V ; !! Consonant-onset

!LEXICON VR_ARTASJNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ь VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj ; !а
!+Refl: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON V_ARTASJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** артасьны:артас -Cны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_ARTASJNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
: VerbConj ; !а
: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON VR_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer-V ; !
+Refl:%^VowRM VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+Refl: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON V_LYDDJYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** лыддьыны:лыддьы ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM VerbDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
:%^VowRM VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

!LEXICON VR_VOLYNY !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Refl:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ы VerbDer-V ; !
!+Refl: VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! check this!!!
!+Refl:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

LEXICON V_VOLYNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** волыны:волы ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM Verb-ynyDer ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%^VowRM VerbDer_KUTNY ; !
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
:%^VowRM VerbConj_KUTNY ; ! check this!!!
: VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

! First model: ы added as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ны, 
! ярм ----- ы ----/


! Second model: ы added earlier, and not as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ыны, 
! ярм ------------/



! =================== !
!! ## Verb conjugation 
! =================== !

LEXICON VerbConj-V !!≈ * **@CODE@**  суф б -- ы 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Inf:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@+Inf+Px1:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@%>ным VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@+Inf+Px2:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@%>ныт VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@+Inf+Px3:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@%>ныс VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@+Inf+Px2+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@%>нытӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@+Inf+Px3+Acc:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@%>нысӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Sg2:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbConj !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-finiteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_KYJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_KYJNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KYJNY ;

LEXICON VerbConj_AMNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_AMNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-finiteforms ;

LEXICON VerbConj_KUTNY !!≈ * **@CODE@** суф а
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms_KUTNY ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer_KUTNY ; !


LEXICON Finiteforms  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present ;
 future ;
 preterite ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_KYJNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_KYJNY ;
 future_KYJNY ;
: preterite_KYJNY ;
: imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_AMNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_AMNY ;
 future_AMNY ;
 preterite_AMNY ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON Finiteforms_KUTNY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present_KUTNY ;
 future_KUTNY ;
 preterite_KUTNY ;
 imperative ;
